Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2738
Appeals; when not allowed.

No appeal shall be allowed from judgments rendered on confession.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XI, § 116, p. 309;

C.S.1929, § 22-1114;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,117;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 51;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-551.